Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB187.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5122(a) introductory paragraph of Title 30 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 5122. Registrations, licenses, permits, plates and statistics.(a) General rule.--[The] Except as otherwise provided under subsection (a.1), the commission may promulgate rules and regulations relating to:* * *(a.1) Restriction.--The commission may not promulgate regulations or require a permit or other launch or related registration of a boat not equipped with a motor in any park, 123456789101112131415161718 forest or waters of this Commonwealth.* * *Section 2. All regulations and parts of regulations are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with this act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0187PN0134 - 2 - 12345